Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2202
Franchise; required; validity.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to construct, install, operate, or maintain in or along the streets, alleys, and public ways, or elsewhere within the corporate limits of any municipality, a community antenna television service without first obtaining, from such municipality involved, a franchise authorizing the community antenna television service. The governing bodies of such municipalities are hereby authorized to grant such a franchise and such franchise shall be effective and binding without submission to the electors and approval by a majority vote thereof, notwithstanding any other law or home rule charter, for a term of not to exceed twenty-five years upon such reasonable conditions as the circumstances may require.

Laws 1959, c. 68, § 2, p. 294;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2802;

Laws 1969, c. 119, § 2, p. 537;

Laws 1979, LB 495, § 3;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 141.

Regulation of community antenna television service is a matter of statewide concern, so that this section, allowing approval of a franchise without a vote of the electorate, takes precedence over a home rule charter provision to the contrary. Hall v. Cox Cable of Omaha, Inc., 212 Neb. 887, 327 N.W.2d 595 (1982).